Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Chapter 6

Criminal Justice Veterans Compensation Act (CJVC) of 2015

16-6-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Nonadversarial approach” means that the district attorney general and the defense attorney work together for the benefit of the veterans treatment court program participants and the program; and

“Veterans treatment court program” means a stand-alone veterans treatment court program established by a judge of a court of this state exercising criminal jurisdiction or a veterans court track created within an existing certified drug court.

Acts 2015, ch. 453, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 453, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this chapter, shall be known and may be cited as the “Criminal Justice Veterans Compensation Act of 2015” or the “CJVC Act.”

For the Preamble to the act concerning the establishment of specialized veterans treatment courts, see Acts 2015, ch. 453.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 453, § 15. July 1, 2015.

16-6-102. Powers of veterans treatment court program.

A veterans treatment court program shall have the same powers as the court that created it. Any disagreements shall be resolved prior to court and not in front of the participants.

Acts 2015, ch. 453, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 453, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this chapter, shall be known and may be cited as the “Criminal Justice Veterans Compensation Act of 2015” or the “CJVC Act.”

For the Preamble to the act concerning the establishment of specialized veterans treatment courts, see Acts 2015, ch. 453.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 453, § 15. July 1, 2015.

16-6-103. Key components of veterans treatment court programs.

All veterans treatment court programs in this state shall be established and operated according to the following ten (10) key components as adopted by the National Clearinghouse for Veterans Treatment Courts at the National Association of Drug Court Professionals:

Veterans treatment courts integrate alcohol and drug treatment and mental health services with justice system case processing;

Veterans treatment courts promote public safety while protecting participants' due process rights by prosecution and defense counsel using a nonadversarial approach;

Veterans treatment courts identify eligible participants early and promptly place them in the veterans treatment court program;

Veterans treatment courts provide access to a continuum of alcohol, drug, mental health, and other related treatment and rehabilitation services;

Veterans treatment courts monitor abstinence by frequent alcohol and other drug testing;

Veterans treatment courts establish a coordinated strategy to govern responses to participants' compliance;

Veterans treatment courts maintain ongoing judicial interaction with each veteran as an essential component of the program;

Veterans treatment courts utilize monitoring and evaluation to measure the achievement of program goals and gauge effectiveness;

Veterans treatment courts employ continuing interdisciplinary education and training to promote effective veterans treatment court planning, implementation, and operations; and

Veterans treatment courts forge partnerships among the court, the veterans administration, public agencies, and community-based organizations to generate local support and enhance veterans treatment court effectiveness.

Acts 2015, ch. 453, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 453, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this chapter, shall be known and may be cited as the “Criminal Justice Veterans Compensation Act of 2015” or the “CJVC Act.”

For the Preamble to the act concerning the establishment of specialized veterans treatment courts, see Acts 2015, ch. 453.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 453, § 15. July 1, 2015.

16-6-104. Administration by department of mental health and substance abuse services.

The department of mental health and substance abuse services shall administer veterans treatment court programs by:

Defining, developing, and gathering outcome measures for veterans treatment court programs, established by this chapter;

Collecting, reporting, and disseminating veterans court treatment program data;

Supporting a state veterans treatment mentor program;

Sponsoring and coordinating state veterans treatment court program training;

Awarding, administering, and evaluating state veterans treatment court program grants;

Developing standards of operation for veterans treatment court programs to ensure there is a significant population of veterans in the criminal justice system willing to volunteer to participate in veterans treatment court programs so that funds are allocated to meet the greatest need; and

Establishing three (3) veterans treatment court advisory committee member positions on the drug court advisory committee established by § 16-22-108.

Acts 2015, ch. 453, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 453, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this chapter, shall be known and may be cited as the “Criminal Justice Veterans Compensation Act of 2015” or the “CJVC Act.”

For the Preamble to the act concerning the establishment of specialized veterans treatment courts, see Acts 2015, ch. 453.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 453, § 15. July 1, 2015.

16-6-105. Application for veterans treatment court program grant funds — Use of funds.

Through the department of mental health and substance abuse services, a court exercising criminal jurisdiction within this state or a veterans treatment court program may apply for veterans treatment court program grant funds established in § 16-22-109(e)(4), if funds are available, to:

Fund a full-time or part-time program director position;

Fund veterans treatment court program staff whose job duties are directly related to program operations;

Fund substance abuse treatment, mental health treatment, and other direct services for veterans treatment court program participants;

Fund drug testing;

Fund program costs directly related to program operations; and

Implement or continue veterans treatment court program operations.

Acts 2015, ch. 453, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 453, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this chapter, shall be known and may be cited as the “Criminal Justice Veterans Compensation Act of 2015” or the “CJVC Act.”

For the Preamble to the act concerning the establishment of specialized veterans treatment courts, see Acts 2015, ch. 453.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 453, § 15. July 1, 2015.

16-6-106. Prohibited uses of veterans treatment court program grant awards.

The department of mental health and substance abuse services veterans treatment court program grant awards shall not be:

Used to pay for costs not directly related to veterans treatment court program operations;

Made to any court that does not agree to operate its veterans treatment court program in accordance with the principles set out in this chapter;

Used for construction or land acquisition;

Used to pay bonuses or commissions to any individuals or organizations; or

Used to form a corporation.

Acts 2015, ch. 453, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 453, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this chapter, shall be known and may be cited as the “Criminal Justice Veterans Compensation Act of 2015” or the “CJVC Act.”

For the Preamble to the act concerning the establishment of specialized veterans treatment courts, see Acts 2015, ch. 453.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 453, § 15. July 1, 2015.

Chapters 7-9

[Reserved]